sk-SK: Certifikačná kvalifikácia paraglidingu: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Iné
en: Paraglider certification rating: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Other
pl: Klasa certyfikacji paralotni: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Inne
de: Zertifizierungsklasse des Gleitschirms: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Sonstige
ro-RO: Calificativul de certificare al parapantei: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Altele
da: Certificeringsklassificering for paraglider: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Anden
vi: Hạng chứng nhận của dù lượn: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Khác
tr: Yamaç paraşütü sertifikasyon derecesi: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Diğer
ja: パラグライダー認証定格: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; その他
pt-BR: Parapente, categoria de certificação: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Outro
sv: Certifieringsklass för paraglider: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Övrigt
hr-HR: Certifikacijska ocjena paraglajdera: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Ostalo
nb: Rangering for paraglider-sertifisering: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Annet
ko: 패러글라이더 인증 등급: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; 기타
ru: Рейтинг сертификации параплана: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Другое
fr: Niveau de certification en parapente: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Autre
es: Calificación de certificación de parapente: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Otro
nl: Certificeringsklasse paraglider: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Overig
hu: Siklóernyő tanúsítási besorolása: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Egyéb
it: Valutazione di certificazione del parapendio: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Altro
fi: Varjoliitimen sertifiointiluokitus: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Muu
lt-LT: Parasparnio sertifikavimo klasė: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Kita
el: Κατάταξη πιστοποίησης αλεξίπτωτου πλαγιάς: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Άλλο
th: ระดับการรับรองร่มร่อน: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Ocena certifikacije jadralnega padala: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Drugo
pt-PT: Categoria de certificação de parapente: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Outro
cs: Kvalifikace pro paragliding: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Jiné
zh-CN: 滑翔伞认证等级: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; 其他
zh-TW: 飛行傘認證等級: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; 其他
bg-BG: Клас на сертификация на парапланер: CCC; EN A; EN B; EN C; EN D; LTF 1; LTF 1-2; LTF 2; LTF 2-3; LTF 3; Друго